Colorado, session 2026A, SB081.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 8-6-120 as
follows:
8-6-120. Overtime wages for agricultural workers - legislative
declaration.
(1) The director shall promulgate rules providing meaningful
overtime and maximum hours protections to agricultural employees to be
proposed no later than October 31, 2021, and adopted no later than
January 31, 2022. In promulgating such rules, the director shall consider
the inequity and racist origins of the exclusion of agricultural employees
from overtime and maximum hours protections available to other
employees, the fundamental right of all employees to overtime and
maximum hours standards that protect the health and welfare of
employees, and the unique difficulties agricultural employees have
obtaining workplace conditions equal to those provided to other
employees.
(1) Legislative declaration.
(a) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THAT:
(I) AGRICULTURAL WORKERS PERFORM ESSENTIAL LABOR THAT
SUSTAINS COLORADO'S FOOD SYSTEMS AND BROADER ECONOMY YET ARE
EXCLUDED FROM MANY BASIC LABOR PROTECTIONS AFFORDED TO OTHER
WORKERS, INCLUDING OVERTIME PROTECTIONS;
(II) FEDERAL OVERTIME PROTECTIONS FOR WORKERS WERE
ESTABLISHED IN THE "FAIR LABOR STANDARDS ACT OF 1938", BUT
CONGRESS EXCLUDED FARMWORKERS AND DOMESTIC WORKERS FROM
-2- SB26-081

SUCH PROTECTIONS. COLORADO, ALONG WITH SEVERAL OTHER STATES,
IMPORTED THE FEDERAL ACT'S EXCLUSION INTO ITS STATE LAW AND THAT
LEGACY CONTINUES TO IMPACT COLORADO AGRICULTURAL WORKERS.
(III) MOST WORKERS IN COLORADO EARN OVERTIME
COMPENSATION AFTER FORTY HOURS IN A WORKWEEK OR TWELVE HOURS
IN A WORKDAY. THIS REFLECTS THE STATE'S LONG-STANDING POLICY THAT
EXTENDED WORK HOURS SHOULD BE COMPENSATED AT A PREMIUM RATE.
(IV) AGRICULTURAL WORKERS, HOWEVER, RECEIVE OVERTIME
PAY ONLY AFTER WORKING MORE THAN FORTY-EIGHT HOURS IN ONE WEEK,
AND HIGHLY SEASONAL AGRICULTURAL WORKERS RECEIVE OVERTIME PAY
ONLY AFTER WORKING MORE THAN FIFTY-SIX HOURS IN ONE WEEK.
AGRICULTURAL WORKERS DO NOT RECEIVE DAILY OVERTIME PAY.
(V) OVERTIME PROTECTIONS ARE A FUNDAMENTAL COMPONENT
OF FAIR LABOR STANDARDS, INTENDED TO:
(A) PREVENT OVERWORK;
(B) PROMOTE HEALTH AND SAFETY;
(C) ENSURE THAT EMPLOYEES ARE FAIRLY COMPENSATED FOR
EXTENDED HOURS OF LABOR; AND
(D) SUPPORT THE FAMILY AND COMMUNITY RELATIONSHIPS THAT
ARE THE FOUNDATION FOR A THRIVING ECONOMY;
(VI) EXTENDING EQUITABLE OVERTIME PAY TO AGRICULTURAL
EMPLOYEES RECOGNIZES THE VALUE OF THEIR LABOR, PROMOTES
ECONOMIC FAIRNESS, AND ALIGNS AGRICULTURAL EMPLOYMENT
STANDARDS WITH THOSE OF OTHER INDUSTRIES; AND
(VII) IN SENATE BILL 21-087, ENACTED IN 2021, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY DIRECTED THE COLORADO DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
EMPLOYMENT TO ADOPT OVERTIME RULES FOR AGRICULTURAL WORKERS
-3- SB26-081

THAT WOULD ADDRESS "THE INEQUITY AND RACIST ORIGINS OF THE
EXCLUSION OF AGRICULTURAL EMPLOYEES FROM OVERTIME AND
MAXIMUM HOURS PROTECTIONS AVAILABLE TO OTHER EMPLOYEES".
DESPITE THIS DIRECTION, AGRICULTURAL WORKERS ARE STILL REQUIRED
TO WORK MORE HOURS TO EARN OVERTIME THAN MOST OTHER WORKERS
IN THE STATE.
(b) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THEREFORE DECLARES THAT
AGRICULTURAL EMPLOYEES ARE ENTITLED TO OVERTIME PROTECTIONS
CONSISTENT WITH THOSE PROVIDED TO OTHER WORKERS AND THAT
ELIMINATING OUTDATED EXCLUSIONS IS NECESSARY TO REMEDY
LONGSTANDING INEQUITIES IN COLORADO LABOR LAW.
(2) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027, AN AGRICULTURAL EMPLOYEE
WHO IS ENTITLED TO RECEIVE A MINIMUM WAGE PURSUANT TO THE
PROVISIONS CONCERNING AGRICULTURAL WORKERS IN THE DIRECTOR'S
RULES RELATED TO COLORADO OVERTIME AND MINIMUM PAY STANDARDS
SHALL BE PAID OVERTIME, AT A RATE OF ONE AND ONE-HALF TIMES THE
EMPLOYEE'S REGULAR RATE OF PAY, FOR ANY WORK PERFORMED IN
EXCESS OF:
(a) FORTY HOURS PER WORKWEEK;
(b) TWELVE HOURS PER WORKDAY; OR
(c) TWELVE CONSECUTIVE HOURS WITHOUT REGARD TO THE START
AND END TIME OF THE WORK SHIFT.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
-4- SB26-081

state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-5- SB26-081